Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB35.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 6.072 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Witnesses testifying before[attending] the General Assembly,[ either house] or a[
legislative] committee, interim committee, statutory committee, subcommittee,
commission, or task force of the General Assembly, are entitled to the same
privileges and immunities[,] and the same compensation[,] as witnesses in other
civil and criminal proceedings[cases]. When summoned by the Commonwealth,
they shall be paid out of the State Treasury.
(2) Any member acting as chair[Chairmen] of a[the] committee,[committees] interim
committee, statutory committee, subcommittee, commission, or task force of the
General Assembly[Senate and House of Representatives] shall[may] administer an
oath[all necessary oaths] to any person who appears or is called to testify before
that[a] committee, interim committee, statutory committee, subcommittee,
commission, or task force of the General Assembly[ of either house].
(3) (a) The oath administered to each witness who testifies before a committee,
interim committee, statutory committee, subcommittee, commission, or task
force of the General Assembly shall follow the oath administered to a
witness in a court of law and read as follows: "Do you swear or affirm that
you will tell the truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth?"
(b) If a witness refuses to take the oath, then he or she shall not be permitted to
testify before the committee.
(4) An oath sworn during a previous committee, interim committee, statutory
committee, subcommittee, commission, or task force meeting shall not apply to
any future meeting of a committee, interim committee, statutory committee,
subcommittee, commission, or task force of the General Assembly.
(5) Testimony given under oath shall be subject to the penalties prescribed in KRS
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 12/17/2025 9:45 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1318
Chapter 523.
(6) All meetings of a committee, interim committee, statutory committee,
subcommittee, commission, or task force of the General Assembly shall be
recorded and transcribed.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 12/17/2025 9:45 AM Jacketed